Washington statutes.
RCW 23.86.070

Applicable fees, charges, and penalties.

Associations organized under or subject to this chapter are subject to the applicable fees, charges, and penalties established by the secretary of state under RCW 23.95.260 and 43.07.120.

[ 2015 c 176 s 9105; 2010 1st sp.s. c 29 s 10; 1993 c 269 s 1; 1991 c 72 s 15; 1989 c 307 s 9; 1982 c 35 s 173; 1959 c 263 s 2; 1953 c 214 s 1; 1925 ex.s. c 99 s 1; 1913 c 19 s 4; RRS s 3907. Formerly RCW 23.56.070.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.

Intent—2010 1st sp.s. c 29: See note following RCW 24.06.450.

Effective date—1993 c 269: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1993." [ 1993 c 269 s 17.]

Legislative finding—1989 c 307: See note following RCW 23.86.007.

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—Application—1982 c 35: See notes following RCW 43.07.160.